tasks/task4/verbs.lexc
!!! verbs.lexc
!!! Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
!!! August 24, 2022

Multichar_Symbols +V +FUT +COND +IMPF +PRS +SBJR +1 +2 +3 +SG +PL @U.VT.A@ @U.VT.E@ @U.VT.I@ @D.VT.A@

LEXICON Root
compr ThematicVowel1;
vend  ThematicVowel2;
! part  ThematicVowel3;

LEXICON ThematicVowel1
< 0:%^ a "@U.VT.A@" > Lemma;

LEXICON ThematicVowel2
< 0:%^ e "@U.VT.E@" > Lemma;

LEXICON ThematicVowel3
< 0:%^ i "@U.VT.I@" > Lemma;

LEXICON Lemma
r:^ PartOfSpeech;

LEXICON PartOfSpeech
+V:0  MoodTense;

LEXICON MoodTense
+FUT:re Marked1SGNonPRS;
+IMPF:va Unmarked1SG;
+COND:ria Unmarked1SG;
+PRS:0 Marked1SGPRS;
< %+SBJR:e "@U.VT.A@" > Unmarked1SG;
< %+SBJR:a "@D.VT.A@" > Unmarked1SG;

LEXICON Unmarked1SG
+1+SG:^ #;
  Common;

LEXICON Marked1SGNonPRS
+1+SG:^i #;
  Common;

LEXICON Marked1SGPRS
+1+SG:^o #;
    Common;

LEXICON Common
+2+SG:^s #;
+3+SG:^ #;
+1+PL:^mos #;
+2+PL:^is #;
+3+PL:^m #;
